Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 10-103, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 10-103. The driver of any a vehicle involved in an
accident resulting only in damage to property or a vehicle which
that is driven or attended by any person shall immediately stop such
vehicle at the scene of such the accident or as close thereto to the
scene of the accident as possible but or shall forthwith immediately
return to and in every event the scene of the accident. The driver
shall remain at the scene of such the accident until he or she has
fulfilled the requirements of Section 10-104 of this title. Every
such stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is
necessary. Any person failing to stop or comply with said the
requirements under such circumstances of this section shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof
shall be punished punishable by a fine not to exceed Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not
more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. In

addition to the criminal penalties imposed by this section, any
person violating the provisions of this section shall be subject to
liability for damages in an amount equal to three times the value of
the damage caused by the accident. Said Such damages shall be
recoverable in a civil action. Nothing in this section shall
prevent a judge from ordering restitution for any damage caused by a
driver involved in an accident provided for in this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 10-106, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 10-106. The driver of any vehicle involved in an
accident resulting only in damage to fixtures, fences, or other
property legally upon or adjacent to a public or private road,
street, or highway shall take reasonable steps to locate and notify
the owner or person in charge of such property of such fact and of
the driver’s name and address and of the registration number of the
vehicle being driven and shall upon request exhibit a driver license
and security verification form, as defined in Section 7-600 of this
title, and shall make report of such accident when and as required
in Section 10-108 of this title.
Any person failing to stop or comply with said such requirements
under such circumstances shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than
one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Nothing in
this section shall prevent a judge from ordering restitution for any
damage caused by a driver involved in an accident provided for in
this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1226 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 18th day of February, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1226 Page 3